en: Meat pies
fr: Tourtes à la viande
hr: Pite od mesa
ja: ミートパイ
lt: Pyragai su mėsa, Mėsos pyragai

en: Beef pies
fr: Tourtes au bœuf, tourtes au boeuf

en: Pork pies
lt: Pyragai su kiauliena

en: Riesling wine and pork pie
fr: Tourte au porc et riesling

en: Chicken and mushroom pies
de: Hühnchen-Pilz-Pasteten
es: Empanadas de pollo y champiñones
fr: Tourtes au poulet et aux champignons
hr: Pite od piletine i gljiva
it: Torte di pollo e funghi
lt: Pyragai su vištiena ir grybais
nl: Kippenpaddestoelentaarten

en: Mushroom pies
fr: Tourtes aux champignons
hr: Pite od gljiva
ja: きのこパイ
lt: Pyragai su grybais
nl: Champignontaarten

en: Squid and spicy tomato sauce pie
fr: Tielles Sétoises, tielles, tielle, tielle sétoise, tielle à la sétoise, tielles à la sétoise
hr: Pita s lignjama i pikantnim umakom od rajčice
lt: Pyragai su kalmarais ir aštriu pomidorų padažu

en: Tripe
es: Callos
fr: Tripes
hr: Tripice
it: Trippa
nl: Pens
pl: Flaki

en: Plant-based meals
ca: Aliments a base de vegetals
de: Pflanzliche Mahlzeiten
es: Comidas preparadas de origen vegetal, Platos preparados de origen vegetal
fi: kasvipohjaiset ateriat
fr: Plats préparés d'origine végétale
he: מנות מן הצומח
hr: Jela na biljnoj bazi
hu: Növényi alapú ételek
it: Piatti a base vegetale
lt: Augaliniai patiekalai
nl: Plantaardige kant-en-klaarmaaltijden
pl: Posiłki roślinne, Dania roślinne
pt: Refeições à base de plantas

en: Falafel mixes
de: Mischung für Falafel
es: Preparados para falafel
fr: Préparations pour falafels, Préparation pour falafel
hr: Falafel mješavine
nl: Falafelmixes

en: Chili sin carne
de: Chili sin Carne
fr: Chili sin carne
hr: Čili sin carne
nl: Chili sin carne
pl: Chili sin carne

en: Meats
bg: Месо
ca: Carns
da: Kød
de: Fleisch
es: Carnes
fi: lihat
fr: Viandes
he: בשרים
hr: mesa, meso
hu: Húsok
it: Carni
ja: 肉
lt: Mėsos
nl: Vlezen, Vlees
pl: Mięsa
pt: Carnes
ru: Мясо
sv: Kött
th: ผลิตภัณฑ์จากเนื้อสัตว์
tr: Et
zh: 肉类, 肉

en: Ground meats
de: Hackfleisch
fr: Viandes hachées
hr: Mljeveno meso

en: Frozen ground meats
fr: Viandes hachées surgelées

en: Ground beef meats
de: Rinder-Hackfleisch, Rinderhackfleisch
fr: Viandes hachées pur bœuf, Viandes hachées de bœuf, viandes hachées de boeuf
hr: Mljeveno goveđe meso

en: Frozen ground beef meats
fr: Viandes hachées pur bœuf surgelées

en: Refrigerated ground beef meats
fr: Viandes hachées pur bœuf refrigérées

en: Cooked meats, Cooked meat
fr: Viandes cuites, Viande cuite
hr: Kuhano meso
lt: Keptos mėsos

en: Smoked cooked meats, Smoked cooked meat
fr: Viandes cuites fumées, Viande cuite fumée

en: Roasted meats
fr: Viandes roties